Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-596
Speed limitation ordinance; requirements for enactment.

No speed limitation ordinance which would directly affect the operations of an interstate railroad shall be valid or enforceable unless its adoption is in compliance with this section. Before the first reading of the proposed ordinance, each railroad the operations of which would be directly affected by the ordinance shall be given written notice by United States mail of the proposed ordinance and the date, time, and place of such reading. Such notice shall be given at least ten days prior to the reading. Each affected railroad shall have an opportunity to be heard at the first reading. After enactment, each railroad the operations of which would be directly affected shall be provided a written or printed copy of the ordinance by United States mail.

Laws 1981, LB 437, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 12.